South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3235.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A)  There is created a study committee to examine current measures for inspecting commercial buildings that are six floors or more in height constructed along the South Carolina coast and on the Charleston peninsula to evaluate their structural soundness. The committee shall determine whether such measures are adequate or whether additional measures, such as period reinspections, should be required, the standards for such reinspections, and measures to be taken when buildings are determined to be structurally unsafe following a reinspection. Particular emphasis must be placed on ensuring regular occupants of such buildings are made aware of such inspections, their results, and related recommendations for improvements. (B)  The study committee is composed of: (1)   the Chairman of the House Labor, Commerce and Industry Committee, or his designee; (2)   the Chairman of the Senate Labor, Commerce and Industry Committee, or his designee; (3)   four structural engineers experienced in evaluating the structural soundness of buildings six floors or more in height along the South Carolina coast or the Charleston peninsula, appointed by the Governor; and (4)   two members of the general public who are members of homeowners associations in such buildings. (C)  Members of the study committee shall serve without compensation, but are allowed the mileage, subsistence, and per diem allowed by law for members of state boards, committees, and commissions, to be paid equally from approved accounts of the House of Representatives and the Senate. (D)  The study committee shall choose its officers and must be provided with clerical, administrative, and research services by the House of Representatives and the Senate. (E)   The study committee shall make a report of its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly by January 1, 2027, at which time the study committee terminates. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----